Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5846.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center overlay districts act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is primarily used for data storage, data processing, or digital operations. (b) "Data center overlay district" means a zoning district established by a local unit of government under section 5. (c) "Governing body" means the body in which the legislative powers of a local unit of government are vested. (d) "Large-scale data center" means a data center that meets or exceeds the thresholds established by ordinance of a local unit of government, including, but not limited to, thresholds relating to electrical load, water usage, or infrastructure investment. (e) "Local impact" means an impact on the public health, safety, and general welfare of the inhabitants and the lands and resources of a local unit of government, including, but not limited to, an impact on any of the following: (i) Energy capacity, consumption, and grid reliability. (ii) Water withdrawals and supply availability. (iii) Water discharge volumes and implications. (iv) Water treatment capacity. (v) Utility rate impacts. (vi) Noise. (vii) Lighting. (viii) Emissions. (ix) Property values. (x) Traffic impacts. (xi) Workforce impacts. (xii) Workforce housing availability. (xiii) Infrastructure impacts. (xiv) Fire and emergency response systems. (f) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village or an agency or instrumentality of a county, township, city, or village. Sec. 5. (1) The governing body of a local unit of government may, by ordinance, establish 1 or more data center overlay districts under this act. A data center overlay district may include an area or group of areas and may be contiguous or noncontiguous. (2) Before establishing, modifying, or eliminating a data center overlay district, a local unit of government must consider the local impacts of data centers. (3) A local unit of government may do any of the following in connection with establishing, modifying, or eliminating a data center overlay district: (a) Create by ordinance a commission with power to accomplish the purposes of this act. (b) Obtain 1 or more studies, analyses, or reports prepared by qualified experts. (c) Conduct 1 or more public meetings or public hearings. (d) Consult with public utilities, emergency service providers, and affected infrastructure operators. Sec. 7. (1) An ordinance establishing or modifying a data center overlay district may subject data centers to any of the following: (a) Additional or modified conditions, standards, or requirements for zoning authorizations. (b) Special land use approval or conditional land use approval requirements. (c) Additional requirements that are necessary to address identified local impacts of data centers. (2) A local unit of government may restrict zoning authorizations for large-scale data centers to a data center overlay district. Sec. 9. (1) A public meeting conducted under this act must be conducted in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (2) Notice of a public hearing conducted under this act must be provided in accordance with section 103 of the Michigan zoning enabling act, 2006 PA 110, MCL 125.3103. (3) A writing prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained as required by this act must be made available to the public in compliance with the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Sec. 11. This act is supplemental to, and does not limit, the authority of a local unit of government under the Michigan zoning enabling act, 2006 PA 110, MCL 125.3101 to 125.3702. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.